Utah statutes.
76-9-506.   Privilege as to communications between interested persons.
A communication made to a person interested in the communication by one who is
also interested, or who stands in a relation to the former as to afford a
reasonable ground for supposing his motive innocent, is not presumed to be
malicious, and is a privileged communication.
